Utah statutes.
20A-9-809.   Counting votes -- Canvass -- Certification of results to parties.

(1)  Votes shall be counted, results tabulated, returns transmitted, ballots reviewed and retained, returns canvassed, and recounts and election contests conducted as provided in Title 20A, Chapter 4, Election Returns and Election Contests.

(2)  After the canvass is complete and the report is prepared, the lieutenant governor shall transmit a copy of the report to each registered political party that participated in Utah's Western States Presidential Primary.

